Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.032

Legal defense of public employee.

In cases in which a public employee subject to RCW 26.44.030 acts in good faith and without gross negligence in his or her reporting duty, and if the employee's judgment as to what constitutes reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect is being challenged, the public employer shall provide for the legal defense of the employee.

[ 1999 c 176 s 31; 1988 c 87 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1999 c 176: See notes following RCW 74.34.005.